Utah statutes.
39-1-32.   National Guard -- Enlistment -- Qualifications -- Discharge.

Any male between the ages of 18 and 45 years, who is a citizen of the United States or who has declared his intention to become a citizen, not prohibited by the laws of the state or of the United States, may be enlisted in the National Guard, subject to such physical and other examinations as may be prescribed by the National Guard Bureau. All persons herein named who shall enlist in the National Guard shall take and subscribe the oath provided by the laws of the United States, and upon so doing shall become members of the National Guard for such period as may be prescribed by the laws of the United States, unless sooner discharged. Enlisted men may be discharged as provided by the laws of the United States and regulations of the National Guard Bureau.



Amended by Chapter 61, 1963 General Session

